Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Licensing and Registration.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Drugs, Narcotics, and Poisons, §§ 69, 72, 75, 76.

28 C.J.S. Supp., Drugs and Narcotics, §§ 31, 32.

Sec. 08.80.110.
Qualifications for licensure by examination.

An applicant for licensure as a pharmacist shall

be fluent in the reading, writing, and speaking of the English language;

furnish the board with at least two affidavits from reputable citizens that the applicant has known for at least one year attesting to the applicant’s good moral character;

be a graduate of a college in a degree program approved by the board;

pass an examination or examinations given by the board or acceptable to the board under the score transfer process administered by the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy;

have completed internship training or another program that has been approved by the board or demonstrated to the board’s satisfaction that the applicant has experience in the practice of pharmacy that meets or exceeds the minimum internship requirements of the board.

History.

(§ 8 ch 194 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 1968; am § 2 ch 72 SLA 1969; am §§ 3, 4 ch 206 SLA 1972; am § 16 ch 127 SLA 1974; am §§ 9, 10 ch 166 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 50 SLA 1989; am §§ 1, 2 ch 70 SLA 1992; am § 7 ch 45 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, registration, and permit requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 1.

For personnel, see 12 AAC 52, art. 2.

Sec. 08.80.115.
Registration of pregraduate and postgraduate intern pharmacist. [Repealed, § 40 ch 177 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 08.80.116.
Internship and other training programs.

An applicant for licensure by examination shall obtain practical experience in the practice of pharmacy concurrent with or after college attendance, or both, under terms and conditions the board shall determine.

The board shall establish licensure requirements for interns and standards for internship or other training programs that are necessary to qualify an applicant for the licensure examination and shall also determine the qualifications of preceptors used in practical experience programs.

History.

(§ 8 ch 45 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, registration, and permit requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 1.

For personnel, see 12 AAC 52, art. 2.

Sec. 08.80.117.
Malpractice insurance. [Repealed, § 7 ch 94 SLA 1980; § 21 ch 166 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 08.80.120.
Grading and content of examination.

The examination or examinations shall be prepared to measure the competence of the applicant to engage in the practice of pharmacy. The board may employ, cooperate, and contract with an organization or consultant in the preparation and grading of an examination, but shall retain sole discretion and responsibility for determining which applicants have successfully passed the examinations.

History.

(§ 89 ch 194 SLA 1955; am § 2 ch 24 SLA 1968; am § 6 ch 206 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 50 SLA 1974; am § 11 ch 23 SLA 1995; am § 9 ch 45 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, registration, and permit requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 1.

Sec. 08.80.130.
Reexamination. [Repealed, § 28 ch 45 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 08.80.140.
License by credentials. [Repealed, § 28 ch 45 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 08.80.145.
Reciprocity; license transfer.

If another jurisdiction allows licensure in that jurisdiction of a pharmacist licensed in this state under conditions similar to those in this section, the board may license as a pharmacist in this state a person licensed as a pharmacist in the other jurisdiction if the person

submits a written application to the board on a form required by the board;

is at least 18 years of age;

is of good moral character;

possesses at the time of the request for licensure as a pharmacist in this state the qualifications necessary to be eligible for licensure in this state;

has engaged in the practice of pharmacy for at least one year or has met the internship requirements of this state within the one-year period immediately before applying for a license under this section;

presents proof satisfactory to the board that the person is currently licensed as a pharmacist in the other jurisdiction and does not currently have a pharmacist license suspended, revoked, or otherwise restricted except for failure to apply for renewal or failure to obtain the required continuing education credits;

has passed an examination approved by the board that tests the person’s knowledge of Alaska laws relating to pharmacies and pharmacists and the regulations adopted under those laws; and

pays all required fees.

History.

(§ 10 ch 45 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, registration, and permit requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 1.

Sec. 08.80.147.
Renewal of licensure.

If a pharmacist fails to apply for renewal of a license within five years from the expiration of the license, the person must pass an examination for license renewal, except that a person who has continually practiced pharmacy in another state under a license issued by the authority of that state may renew an expired license in this state upon fulfillment of the requirements that may be established by the board.

History.

(§ 10 ch 45 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For license renewal and continuing education requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 3.

Sec. 08.80.150.
Temporary license.

The board shall adopt regulations regarding the issuance of a temporary license to practice pharmacy.

History.

(§ 9 ch 194 SLA 1955; am § 9 ch 206 SLA 1972; am § 13 ch 166 SLA 1980; am § 11 ch 45 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, registration, and permit requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 1.

Sec. 08.80.155.
Emergency permit.

The board shall adopt regulations regarding the issuance of an emergency permit to practice pharmacy.

History.

(§ 10 ch 206 SLA 1972; am § 14 ch 166 SLA 1980; am § 12 ch 45 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, registration, and permit requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 1.

Sec. 08.80.157.
Licensing of facilities.

A facility engaged in the practice of pharmacy or in the manufacture, production, or wholesale distribution of drugs or devices, and a pharmacy where drugs or devices are dispensed, shall be licensed by the board, and shall renew the license at intervals determined by the board. If operations are conducted at more than one location, each location shall be licensed by the board.

The board may by regulation determine the licensure classifications of facilities and establish minimum standards for the facilities.

The board shall establish by regulation the criteria that a facility must meet to qualify for licensure in each classification. The board may issue licenses with varying restrictions to facilities when the board considers it necessary to protect the public interest.

The board may deny or refuse to renew a license if it determines that the granting or renewing of the license would not be in the public interest.

Licenses issued by the board are not transferable or assignable.

The board shall specify by regulation the minimum standards for responsibility of a facility or pharmacy that has employees or personnel engaged in the practice of pharmacy or engaged in the manufacture, wholesale distribution, production, or use of drugs or devices in the conduct of its business.

A licensed facility shall report to the board

permanent closing;

change of ownership; management, location, or pharmacist-in-charge of a pharmacy;

theft or loss of drugs or devices as defined by regulations of the board;

conviction of an employee of violation of a state or federal drug law;

disasters, accidents, theft, destruction, or loss relating to records required to be maintained by state or federal law;

occurrences of significant adverse drug reactions as defined by regulations of the board;

other matters and occurrences the board may require by regulation.

The board may suspend, revoke, deny, or refuse to renew the license of a facility or pharmacy on the following grounds:

the finding by the board of violations of a federal, state, or local law relating to the practice of pharmacy, drug samples, wholesale or retail drug or device distribution, or distribution of controlled substances;

a felony conviction under federal, state, or local law of an owner of the facility or pharmacy or of an employee of the facility or pharmacy;

the furnishing of false or fraudulent material in an application made in connection with drug or device manufacturing or distribution;

suspension or revocation by federal, state, or local government of a license currently or previously held by the applicant for the manufacture or distribution of drugs or devices, including controlled substances;

obtaining remuneration by fraud, misrepresentation, or deception;

dealing with drugs or devices that are known or should have been known to be stolen drugs or devices;

dispensing or distributing drugs or devices directly to patients by a wholesale drug distributor other than a pharmacy;

violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter.

The board’s regulations under (b) — (d) and (f) of this section may not establish more stringent licensing requirements for the facilities governed by AS

08.80.390

than are set out in AS

08.80.390

.

This section does not apply to the offices of physicians, osteopaths, podiatrists, physician assistants, advanced nurse practitioners, dentists, veterinarians, dispensing opticians, or optometrists.

This section applies to wholesale drug distributors, third-party logistics providers, and outsourcing facilities located outside the state under AS

08.80.159

.

History.

(§ 15 ch 166 SLA 1980; am § 13 ch 45 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 66 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, registration, and permit requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 1.

For personnel, see 12 AAC 52, art. 2.

For license renewal and continuing education requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 3.

For guidelines for pharmacies and pharmacists, see 12 AAC 52, art. 4.

For pharmacy practice standards, see 12 AAC 52, art. 5.

For wholesale drug distributors and facilities, see 12 AAC 52, art. 6.

For institutional pharmacies, see 12 AAC 52, art. 7.

For drug rooms and facilities without a pharmacy, see 12 AAC 52, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, added (k).

Sec. 08.80.158.
Registration of pharmacies located outside of state.

A pharmacy located outside of the state that regularly ships, mails, or delivers prescription drugs to consumers in the state shall register with the board.

A pharmacy registering with the board under (a) of this section shall furnish to the board annually

the location, names, and titles of all principal corporate officers and of all pharmacists who are dispensing prescription drugs to residents of the state;

a copy of a current valid license, permit, or registration to conduct operations in the jurisdiction in which it is located, and a copy of the most recent report resulting from an inspection of the pharmacy by the regulatory or licensing agency of the jurisdiction in which the pharmacy is located;

a sworn statement indicating that the pharmacy complies with all lawful directions and requests for information from the regulatory or licensing authority of the jurisdiction in which the pharmacy is licensed; and

proof satisfactory to the board that the pharmacy maintains its records of prescription drugs dispensed to persons in the state so that the records are readily retrievable from the records of other prescription drugs dispensed by the pharmacy.

A pharmacy subject to this section shall, during its regular hours of operation, provide a toll-free telephone service to facilitate communication between persons in the state and a pharmacist at the pharmacy who has access to records concerning the dispensing of prescription drugs to persons in the state. The toll-free number and the hours that the service is available shall be disclosed on a label affixed to each container of drugs dispensed to persons in the state. The telephone service shall be available at least 40 hours a week and at least six days a week.

The board may, after a hearing, deny, revoke, or suspend the registration of a pharmacy located outside of the state and subject to this section if the pharmacy fails to comply with the requirements of this section, AS

17.20.080

—

17.20.135

, or AS

17.30.020

—

17.30.080

, or if the license, permit, or registration of the pharmacy is denied, revoked, or suspended by the licensing or regulatory agency of the jurisdiction in which the pharmacy is located.

A pharmacy located outside of the state that is subject to this section but is not registered with the board under this section may not ship, mail, or deliver prescription drugs into the state and may not advertise its services in the state.

A pharmacy subject to this section shall appoint a registered agent in the state who is empowered to accept, on behalf of the pharmacy, process, notice, and demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the pharmacy. If the pharmacy fails to appoint an agent under this subsection, if the registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, or if the registration of the pharmacy is suspended or revoked, the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development is an agent upon whom process, notice, or demand may be served. Service is made upon the commissioner in the same manner as provided for corporations under AS

10.06.175(b)

, except that for the purposes of AS

10.06.175(b)

(2)(A), the address shall be the last registered address of the pharmacy as shown by the records of the board.

The board shall by regulation define “regularly” for this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 56 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in (f) of this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” in (f) of this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, registration, and permit requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 1.

Sec. 08.80.159.
Licensing and inspection of facilities outside of state.

Before shipping, mailing, or delivering prescription drugs to a licensee in the state or advertising in the state, a wholesale drug distributor, third-party logistics provider, or an outsourcing facility that is located outside the state shall

obtain a license under AS

08.80.157

;

appoint an agent on whom process can be served in the state; and

authorize inspection of the facility by a designee of the board under (c) of this section.

In addition to the requirements of (a) of this section, an outsourcing facility shall

register as an outsourcing facility with the United States Food and Drug Administration; and

comply with the requirements of 21 U.S.C. 353b (Drug Quality and Security Act).

Upon application by a wholesale drug distributor, third-party logistics provider, or an outsourcing facility for a license under this section, the board may

require an inspection of the applicant’s facility located outside the state; and

approve a designee to conduct the inspection.

The board shall adopt regulations necessary to implement this section.

History.

(§ 5 ch 66 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 19, ch. 66, SLA 2018 makes this section effective July 1, 2019.

Sec. 08.80.160.
Fees.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall set fees under AS

08.01.065

for the following:

examination;

reexamination;

investigation for licensing by license transfer;

pharmacist license;

temporary license;

pharmacy technician license;

pharmacy intern license;

emergency permit;

license amendment or replacement;

registration or licensure of a facility classified under AS

08.80.157(b)

.

History.

(§ 10(a) ch 194 SLA 1955; am § 4 ch 24 SLA 1968; am § 11 ch 206 SLA 1972; am §§ 16, 21 ch 166 SLA 1980; am § 45 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 56 SLA 1992; am § 14 ch 45 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For licensing, registration, and permit requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 1.

Sec. 08.80.165.
Continuing education requirements.

The board shall establish requirements for continuing education in pharmacy that must be satisfied before a license issued under this chapter may be renewed.

History.

(§ 15 ch 45 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For license renewal and continuing education requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 3.

Sec. 08.80.168.
Administration of vaccines and related emergency medications.

A pharmacist may independently administer a vaccine and related emergency medication if the pharmacist has completed an immunization training program approved by the board and otherwise complies with the standards established by the board under AS

08.80.030(b)

.

A pharmacist may independently dispense an opioid overdose drug if the pharmacist has completed an opioid overdose drug training program approved by the board and otherwise complies with the standards established by the board under AS

08.80.030(b)

.

In this section,

“opioid overdose drug” has the meaning given in AS

17.20.085

;

“related emergency medication” includes an epinephrine injection or other medication for the treatment of a severe allergic reaction to a vaccine.

History.

(§ 2 ch 16 SLA 2015; am §§ 2, 3 ch 2 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. --

Subsections (b) and (c) were enacted as (c) and (b); relettered in 2018.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective March 15, 2016, in (b), added (b)(1), and made a related change; added (c).

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 16, SLA 2015, which enacted this section, took effect on August 9, 2015.

Secs. 08.80.170 — 08.80.210.
Fees. [Repealed, § 7 ch 24 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.80.220.
Prescription department required for issuance of license. [Repealed, § 28 ch 45 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 08.80.230.
Sanitary conditions required for issuance of license. [Repealed, § 28 ch 45 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 08.80.240.
Form and display of registration certificate and license. [Repealed, § 28 ch 45 SLA 1996.]

Secs. 08.80.250 — 08.80.260.
Renewal of lapsed registration; ground for refusing or revoking a license. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 08.80.261.
Disciplinary sanctions.

The board may deny a license to an applicant or, after a hearing, impose a disciplinary sanction authorized under AS

08.01.075

on a person licensed under this chapter when the board finds that the applicant or licensee, as applicable,

secured or attempted to secure a license through deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation;

engaged in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation in the course of providing professional services or engaging in professional activities;

advertised professional services in a false or misleading manner;

has been convicted of a felony or has been convicted of another crime that affects the applicant’s or licensee’s ability to practice competently and safely;

intentionally or negligently engaged in or permitted the performance of patient care by persons under the applicant’s or licensee’s supervision that does not conform to minimum professional standards regardless of whether actual injury to the patient occurred;

failed to comply with this chapter, with a regulation adopted under this chapter, or with an order of the board;

is incapable of engaging in the practice of pharmacy with reasonable skill, competence, and safety for the public because of

professional incompetence;

failure to keep informed of or use current professional theories or practices;

addiction or severe dependency on alcohol or a drug that impairs the applicant’s or licensee’s ability to practice safely;

physical or mental disability; or

other factors determined by the board;

engaged in conduct involving moral turpitude or gross immorality;

made a controlled substance available to a person except upon prescription issued by a person licensed to prescribe controlled substances;

was convicted of selling federal legend drugs without the prescription of a person licensed to prescribe federal legend drugs;

violated state or federal laws or regulations pertaining to drugs or pharmacies;

failed to report relevant information to the board about a pharmacist or pharmacy intern that the applicant or licensee knew or suspected was incapable of engaging in the practice of pharmacy with reasonable skill, competence, and safety to the public;

aided another person to engage in the practice of pharmacy or to use the title of “pharmacist” or “pharmacy intern” without a license; or

engaged in unprofessional conduct, as defined in regulations of the board.

The board may place under seal all drugs that are owned by or in the possession, custody, or control of a licensee at the time a license is suspended or revoked or at the time the board refuses to renew a license. Except for perishable items, the drugs may not be disposed of until the licensee has exhausted administrative and judicial remedies relating to the licensing action. Perishable items may be sold upon order of the court with the proceeds to be deposited with the court. The board shall notify the Department of Health and Social Services about drugs placed under seal under this subsection.

History.

(§ 17 ch 166 SLA 1980; am § 9 ch 59 SLA 1982; am §§ 16, 17 ch 45 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 140 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 08.80.260. Renumbered in 1980.

Cross references. —

For disciplinary powers of board, see AS

08.01.075

.

Administrative Code. —

For license renewal and continuing education requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 3.

For wholesale drug distributors and facilities, see 12 AAC 52, art. 6.

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 52, art. 9.

Collateral references. —

Revocation or suspension of license or permit to practice pharmacy or operate drugstore because of improper sale or distribution of narcotic or stimulant drugs, 17 ALR3d 1408.

Revocation or suspension of license for wrongful or excessive prescription of drugs, 22 ALR4th 668.

Sec. 08.80.265.
Limits or conditions on license; discipline. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 08.80.266.
Disciplinary sanctions. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.075.]

Sec. 08.80.270.
Executive administrator of the board.

The board shall employ an executive administrator to carry out the duties established under (b) of this section. The executive administrator is the principal executive officer of the board. The executive administrator is in the partially exempt service under AS

39.25.120

and is entitled to receive a monthly salary equal to a step in Range 23 on the salary schedule set out in AS

39.27.011(a)

.

The executive administrator shall

perform duties associated with the licensing and regulation of licensees under this chapter as prescribed by the board; and

serve as a liaison to the legislative and executive branches of state government, the media, and other state pharmacy boards.

History.

(§ 6 ch 66 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 18, ch. 66, SLA 2018 makes this section effective July 25, 2018, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.